Hawaii, session 2025, GM1198.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAH:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the State is home to
a rich diversity of indigenous species of aquatic life,
wildlife, and land plants that are vital to maintaining
ecological balance and preserving the cultural heritage of the
region.
The legislature further finds that many of these native
species face significant threats from overexploitation, habitat
destruction, and climate change, which require immediate and
enhanced protective measures to ensure their long-term survival.
The legislature recognizes the ‘io, or Hawaiian hawk, as an
indigenous species of note, serving as a symbol of strength and
resilience in Hawaiian culture and playing a vital role in
Hawai'i's unique ecosystem as a native raptor. As an apex
predator, the ‘io helps maintain ecological balance, controlling
populations of rodents and other invasive species that threaten
native flora and fauna. However, the ‘io faces ongoing threats
2025-3011 SB849 HD2 HMSO ;

Page 2
S.B. NO. -1
from habitat loss, illegal hunting, and environmental
degradation.
The legislature declares that the unauthorized taking and
killing of indigenous species such as the ‘io not only disrupts
ecological systems but also undermines ongoing conservation
efforts and risks the loss of irreplaceable biodiversity.
Therefore, penalties for harming or endangering indigenous
species, including the ‘io, are crucial to deterring these
harmful actions to restore Hawai‘i's fragile ecosystems for
future generations.
However, the legislature believes that the current
penalties for violations involving native species do not
adequately deter harmful activities. Strengthening these
penalties, including the imposition of significant fines and the
classification of certain offenses as class C felonies, will
provide stronger enforcement tools for the State to protect
these critical species.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Prohibit and impose penalties for intentionally
taking, harming, or killing ‘io; and
2025-3011 SB849 HD2 HMSO
llllilHinMIllllOil

Page 3
S.B. NO.
(2) Increase penalties and fees for taking and killing
species of aquatic life, wildlife, and land plants
that are native to the State.
SECTION 2. Chapter 195D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
"§195D- Taking, harming, or killing a Hawaiian hawk;
prohibited. Except as otherwise provided in section 183D-62,
the intentional taking, harming, or killing of an ‘io, or
Hawaiian hawk (Buteo solitarius), shall be subject to penalties
under section 195D-9."
SECTION 3. Section 195D-9, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended as follows:
1. By amending subsection (a) to read:
"(a) Any person who violates any of the provisions of this
chapter [+]or[-}-] the provisions of any rule adopted [hcroundor]
pursuant to this chapter shall be guilty of [a miodemeaner and
ahal-l 'bo punished as follows] :
(1) A misdemeanor for a first offense, punishable by
a fine of [net] no less than $250 or by imprisonment
of [neb] no more than one year, or both; and
2025-3011 SB849 HD2 HMSO 3

Page 4
S.B. NO. SS.1
(2) [Fe^?] A class C felony for a second or subsequent
offense [within five years-of- a prcvieua conviction by
d] and upon conviction shall be subject to one or any
combination of the following:
(A) A fine of [ftetr] no less than [$5Q0 or by
imprisonment] $1,000;
(B) Imprisonment of [aefe] no more than [one year/—e^?
feeth-r] two years; or
(C) Rehabilitative community service."
2. By amending subsections (d) and (e) to read:
"(d) Except as otherwise provided by law, the board or its
authorized representative by proper delegation [in authorized
t©] m^ set, charge, and collect administrative fines or bring
legal action to recover administrative fees and costs as
documented by receipts or affidavit, including attorneys' fees
and costs, or bring legal action to recover administrative
fines, fees, and costs, including attorneys' fees and costs, or
payment for damages or for the cost to correct damages resulting
from a violation of this chapter or any rule adopted thereunder.
The administrative fines shall be as follows:
2025-3011 SB849 HD2 HMSO
iniiiMiiiiiHiiMiniH

Page 5
S.B. NO. ’
• H.D. 2
(1) For a first violation, a fine of [not more- ■than
$2/500,] no less than $2,500 and no more than $5,000
or rehabilitative community service, or both;
(2) For a second violation [within five years of a
p-re-vious -v-i-ohation] , a fine of [not more than $5,000;]
no less than $5,000 and no more than $10,000 or
rehabilitative community service, or both; and
(3) For a third or subsequent violation [with-i-n five years-
of -the last -v-iolation] , a fine of [not more than
$10,000.] no less than $10,000 and no more than
$20,000 or rehabilitative community service, or both.
(e) In addition, an administrative fine of up to [$5,000]
$10,000 or rehabilitative community service, or both, may be
levied for each specimen of wildlife or plant taken, killed,
injured, or damaged in violation of this chapter or any rule
adopted thereunder."
SECTION 4. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 5. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
2025-3011 SB849 HD2 HMSO
■HiMlliaiMM

Page 6
S.B. NO. Bl
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-3011 SB849 HD2 HMSO 6
■liimiiMiiiiiiyii

849
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
APPROVED this 27th day of May ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI I

S.B.No. 849, S.D. 1,H.D.2
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date: April 17, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 849, SD 1,HD2
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE
STATE OF HAWAII
Date; April 4, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Third Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives